Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIV Libraries And Archives
Kentucky Historical Society

171.310.
Kentucky Historical Society. [Repealed.]

171.311.
Kentucky Historical Society.

The Kentucky Historical Society created by Acts 1880, ch. 244, shall have all the powers and liabilities of a corporation and there is hereby granted to the society the following charter:

The Kentucky Historical Society shall educate and engage the public through Kentucky history in order to confront the issues of the future. To that end, the society shall collect, maintain, and preserve authentic records, information, and artifacts connected with the history of the Commonwealth and the genealogy of her peoples; and promote a wider appreciation of the American heritage, with particular emphasis on the advancement and dissemination of knowledge of the history of Kentucky. The society may receive and hold by donation or devise, real or personal property to any extent and may, by gift, loan, purchase, or otherwise hold books, papers, documents, historical memorials, and any other articles suited to promote the objects of the society in the Thomas D. Clark Center for Kentucky History, the Old State Capitol Building, or the Kentucky Military History Museum, but all such property shall be held in trust for the Commonwealth of Kentucky according to the terms of acceptance.

All persons, partnerships, corporations, or associations who shall evidence their dedication to the promotion of the objects and purposes of the society may become active members thereof upon their approval under regulations prescribed by the governing board and the payment of annual dues in a sum determined by the governing board. The governing board may determine classes of memberships and establish respective rates of dues. Every member in good standing, including the authorized representative of an institutional member, shall have the right to vote in person or by proxy, hold office, and otherwise take part in the proceedings of the society. Membership may be terminated by resignation or nonpayment of dues.

The officers of the society shall be a chancellor, who shall be the Governor of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, a president, first, second, and third vice presidents, who shall be ex officio members of the governing board. All officers, except the chancellor, shall be elected for a term of one (1) year at the annual meeting of the society in a manner provided by law, and the president shall be ineligible to succeed himself if he has been elected for two (2) successive terms.

There is hereby created a governing board which shall consist of sixteen (16) members, the officers of the society, and one (1) person designated annually by the State Archives and Records Commission. The sixteen (16) members of the governing board shall be divided into four (4) equal classes, so arranged that the terms of one (1) class shall expire at each annual meeting of the society. The class whose term expires shall be ineligible to succeed itself.

The governing board shall execute all the powers and duties conferred on the society, except those expressly delegated to the officers. It shall adopt bylaws at any regular or special meeting. It shall supervise and direct the financial concerns of the society, approve an annual budget and provide for and fix the salaries of employees, subject to the approval of the Personnel Cabinet. It shall provide for reimbursement of travel expenses of employees and may provide for reimbursement of expenses of officers and members of the governing board incurred in performing specific duties assigned to them. It shall appoint an executive director, who shall be the operating management officer of the society under the direction of the president and policies established by the governing board, and a deputy director, who shall assume the duties of the executive director in his absence and perform such other duties as may be assigned to him by the executive director. It shall establish and prescribe the duties of such other positions as are necessary to operate the society, and all persons engaged to fill such positions shall be employed by the executive director, subject to the approval of the governing board , which approval shall constitute exemption from KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

, and their work shall be under the executive director’s supervision.

The governing board shall provide for the publication or preservation of historical documents and manuscripts; publish, including by electronic means, an edition to be known as the “Register”; provide by contract, subject to the approval of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, for all the printing, publication, and distribution of, including by electronic means, reports, books, and other publications calculated to promote and advance the historical interest of Kentucky and augment the society’s various collections at all times. It shall supervise and direct the ordinary affairs of the society; appoint a nominating committee; and determine other necessary committees of which the president and the executive director of the society shall be ex officio members. The governing board shall cooperate with, provide assistance to, and coordinate its functions with those of the state Archives and Records Commission. It may designate honorary members of the society and it shall have the power to fill any vacancies until the next annual meeting, including those occurring within its own membership.

The governing board shall hold regular meetings in January, April, July, and October. Matters to be determined and discussed at meetings shall be furnished to the executive director at least ten (10) days prior to meetings in order that he may prepare and distribute an agenda to each member of the governing board at least three (3) days before the meeting. Special meetings shall be held at the request of the president or any three (3) members of the governing board, in which case the executive director shall give written notice together with the agenda of the meeting at least ten (10) days in advance. In an emergency, nine (9) members of the committee may waive the provision of notice.

The regular annual meeting of the society shall be held on the first Friday after the first Monday in November. The meeting shall be open to all members. Special meetings may be called in Frankfort or elsewhere by the president or a majority of the governing board or by the executive director upon the written request of twenty (20) members of the society. Members shall have fifteen (15) days written notice of the time, place, and subject of the meeting.

Twenty-five (25) members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business at any meeting of the society, and one-third (1/
3
) of the membership of the governing board shall constitute a quorum at their respective meetings.

The Chancellor of the Society, at his discretion, may preside at any meeting of the society or the governing board, or he may participate otherwise in any meetings.

The president of the society shall be the chief executive officer of the society and shall preside over meetings of the society or the governing board in the absence of the chancellor or at his request. He shall recommend the appointment of all necessary or desirable committees and he shall name persons to comprise committees, except the nominating committee.

The vice presidents of the society shall preside in the absence of their successive superiors in office at all meetings of the society and the governing board. They shall attend all regular and special meetings of the society and the governing board and endeavor to familiarize themselves with the conduct and operations of the affairs of the society. They shall aid and assist the president in the performance of his duties, counsel and advise the governing board, and endeavor at all times to advance and promote the public interest in the history of Kentucky and its people.

Nominations to membership on the governing board and to the offices of president, first vice president, second vice president, and third vice president shall be made by a nominating committee or by any member present at the regular annual meeting. The nominating committee shall consist of five (5) members, shall be appointed at the first regular meeting of the governing board after the annual meeting of the society and shall consider candidates to fill vacancies in the governing board and offices which will occur at the subsequent annual meeting. The nominating committee shall meet forty-five (45) days prior to the annual meeting and nominate candidates to fill vacancies on the governing board and at least one (1) candidate for the office of president, first vice president, second vice president, and third vice president, and file same with the president. Upon the call for the election of officers, the president shall promptly report the nomination by the nominating committee together with all other nominations. When more than the required number of candidates have been nominated for membership on the governing board or more than one (1) candidate for the offices to be filled, the president shall call for an election by the vote of those present, together with the number of votes cast by proxy, and a plurality of all votes cast shall be sufficient to elect. Where no vote count is required, the president shall cast one (1) vote for each candidate and he or she shall be declared elected.

This charter may be amended by a two-thirds (2/
3
) vote of the members present and voting at any regular meeting or at any special meeting of the society called for the purpose, provided that written notice containing the substance of the proposed amendments shall have been distributed by mail or electronically to members not less than thirty (30) days in advance of such meeting and the same approved as an amendment by the first General Assembly, meeting after the action of the society.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 169, § 1; 1962, ch. 143; 1974, ch. 34, § 1; 1980, ch. 188, § 128, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 448, § 69, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 154, § 82, effective July 15, 1998; 2015 ch. 69, § 1, effective June 24, 2015.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Historical Society has the right to contract for rental of the souvenir concession with the approval of the Department of Finance (now Finance and Administration Cabinet), but the curator’s duties include supervising and operating the souvenir stand which he could not do if the concession were completely rented.

OAG 61-456

.

The Kentucky Historical Society may enter into a contract with the Department of the Navy to conduct a research project relating to the collection and classification of certain historical and other data on automatic weapons as such purpose is included in the promotion of a wider appreciation of the American heritage, with particular emphasis on the advancement and dissemination of knowledge of the history of Kentucky provided for in subdivision I of this section.

OAG 75-328

.

Where property given or loaned the Kentucky Historical Society is no longer appropriate nor of value to the Society for the intended historical purposes, but where the lender has failed to provide the procedure or method of disposal, the Society must make a reasonable effort to ascertain the whereabouts of the lender, his heirs or relatives before applying for escheat by the Commonwealth.

OAG 76-328

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Schroder, The Preservation of Historical Areas, 62 Ky. L.J. 940 (1973-1974).

Note, Historic Preservation — An Individual’s Perspective, 67 Ky. L.J. 1018 (1978-1979).

171.312.
Divisions of society — Division directors.

In order to better facilitate the operation and management, the Kentucky Historical Society shall be organized into four (4) separate divisions. These divisions shall include: Research and Publications; Oral History and Educational Outreach; Administration; and Museums. The divisions shall be headed by a director appointed by the governing board of the Kentucky Historical Society of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet pursuant to KRS

171.311

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 15, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 209, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 2006, ch. 211, § 108, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 16, § 43, effective June 25, 2009; 2015 ch. 69, § 5, effective June 24, 2015.

171.313.
Duties as to information concerning Kentucky family cemeteries and as to gravesites of historically significant people — Administrative regulations.

In addition to the responsibilities set forth in KRS

171.311

, the Kentucky Historical Society shall:

Collect, maintain, preserve, categorize, and cause to be published necessary information concerning Kentucky family cemeteries;

Undertake a systematic program which will restore and maintain the gravesites of any of the following historically significant people who are buried within this Commonwealth:

Past Governors of the Commonwealth and their spouses;

The three (3) former Vice Presidents of the United States from the Commonwealth: Richard M. Johnson; John C. Breckinridge; and Alben W. Barkley; and

The “First Pioneers,” who were the original members in the first settlements at either Boonesboro, Harrodsburg, or Stanford in 1774-1775; and

Promulgate administrative regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 198, § 1; 1996, ch. 156, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 78, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The legislative intent in subsection (2) of this section was that the required rules and regulations be adopted for the purpose of standardizing and providing a modus operandi to be followed by the Kentucky Historical Society’s internal management in administering this section; it was never intended that the rules and regulations should affect private rights or procedures generally available to the public and such rules and regulations are not to be regulations within the purview of KRS Ch. 13 (now KRS Ch. 13A).

OAG 76-483

.

171.315.
Headquarters of society — Priority for maintenance.

The headquarters of the Kentucky Historical Society shall be located in the Thomas D. Clark Center for Kentucky History, and the society shall control in all respects the manner in which the grounds surrounding the center, the building, and the space therein, shall be used. The society shall exercise the same control over the Old State Capitol Building, and the society shall use the Old State Capitol Building for purposes of the society as it shall deem necessary and proper. The grounds around the Old State Capitol Building and its annex, the grounds being now bounded by Broadway, Clinton, and Lewis Streets, and adjoining the federal property occupied by the John C. Watts Building, shall be subject to the control of the society and be used by the society, for purposes of the society as it shall deem necessary and proper. Major alterations or other changes concerning the building, annex, or grounds shall be made under the authority of the governing board of the Kentucky Historical Society and under the general supervision of the executive director who shall determine the nature and extent of any work to be done so as to protect the architectural integrity of the original structures. The maintenance and security of the building, annex, and grounds shall be the responsibility of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and shall be of highest priority among the other responsibilities of the state for capital construction, maintenance, or security. At the direction of the governing board, the executive director of the society may request the Finance and Administration Cabinet to perform, or cause to be performed, any work he deems necessary for the proper preservation and protection of the properties. The work shall either be undertaken within no less than sixty (60) days from the date of notification to the Finance and Administration Cabinet, or the secretary of the cabinet shall show cause, in writing, to the governing board and the executive director why such work was not undertaken.

No part of, or interest in, the real property hereinabove specified shall be leased, sold, or otherwise disposed of under any circumstances. The real property, including the building interiors, shall be maintained and preserved in a manner consistent with the best interests of the Commonwealth.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 40, § 1; 1968, ch. 186; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1978, ch. 361, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 2015 ch. 69, § 6, effective June 24, 2015.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Kentucky Historical Society constitutes a department of state government.

OAG 63-657

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

State Archives and Records Commission, nomination of member, KRS

171.420

.

171.320.
Payment of money to society, conditions of. [Repealed.]

171.321.
Receipts by society from nongovernmental sources — Audit of fund.

Receipts by the Kentucky Historical Society of gifts, bequests, and devises from private persons, corporations, and other nongovernmental entities shall be held, deposited, invested, and used by the Kentucky Historical Society under the direction of its governing board and shall be exempt from the requirements of KRS

41.070

. Such receipts shall be deemed to include gifts, bequests, and devises heretofore made to the society and separately accounted for by the society under the names of donors as well as gifts, bequests, and devises received after July 13, 1984, and shall also include payments to the Boone day fund and to the Kentucky junior historical society fund, neither of which shall accept any governmental appropriations or grants.

Funds held by the Kentucky Historical Society as provided in this section shall be audited by an independent certified public accounting firm, at least once each fiscal year, at the expense of the society, which shall be paid for from the fund being audited unless otherwise provided for. A copy of the audit shall be forwarded promptly to the Governor as chancellor of the society, who shall file it with the Secretary of State.

This section shall not exclude the society from the requirements of KRS

41.070

with respect to any funds received by it which are appropriated from the State Treasury, or received by the society other than as a gift, bequest, devise, or contribution enumerated in subsection (1) of this section or derogate from the status of the society as an independent agency of the Commonwealth otherwise subject to all requirements of state law applicable to such agencies.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 242, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 2015 ch. 69, § 7, effective June 24, 2015.

171.325.
Local history trust fund — Purpose — Application, qualification, and approval standards — Administrative regulations.

The local history trust fund is created as a separate trust fund. The fund shall consist of moneys collected from the income tax checkoff created under KRS

141.441

and any other proceeds from grants, contributions, appropriations, or other moneys made available for the purposes of the trust fund.

Trust fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.

Any interest earnings of the trust fund shall become a part of the trust fund and shall not lapse.

Trust fund moneys shall be used to support local history through grants made to local history organizations in Kentucky. Funds shall be administered and distributed by the Kentucky Historical Society for the purposes directed in this section.

Moneys transferred to the trust fund pursuant to KRS

141.441

are hereby appropriated for the purposes set forth in this section.

The Kentucky Historical Society shall develop standards for qualifying applicants, and for applying and approving grants from the trust fund, and may promulgate administrative regulations as needed to implement this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 102, § 14, effective July 15, 2014.

171.330.
Expenses; salaries; publication of magazine. [Repealed.]

171.340.
Old books and documents — Governor and fiscal courts may authorize delivery to society.

The Governor may assign to the Kentucky Historical Society for safekeeping any articles of historical interest belonging to the state.

The county officers may turn over to the Kentucky Historical Society old books or documents in their offices suitable for preservation as archives of the state but no longer of use or value to the counties, in order that they may be properly preserved for future generations. No books or documents of any county shall be turned over to the society except upon the order of the fiscal court of the county.

History.

2290a-2.

171.345.
Kentucky Military History Museum — Duties of Kentucky Historical Society and Department of Military Affairs — Location — Advisory committees.

There is established the Kentucky Military History Museum which shall be housed in the State Arsenal, and shall serve as repository of objects relating to the Commonwealth’s military history.

The Kentucky Historical Society and its staff shall maintain the museum, receive, store and catalogue all military historical items, and exercise fiduciary responsibility in the preservation and maintenance of the State Arsenal and all objects placed or loaned for display therein.

The Department of Military Affairs and the adjutant general shall provide the State Arsenal as the museum facility, shall maintain and operate the building and grounds, and shall cooperate in contributing items of military history for display within the museum.

The Military History Museum shall be attached to the Kentucky Historical Society for administrative and other purposes.

The Kentucky Historical Society may empanel such advisory committees as it determines to be necessary to assist in the administration of the Military History Museum. Members of such committees shall serve as needed without compensation or reimbursement.

The Kentucky Historical Society may promulgate administrative regulations as necessary for the operation of the Military History Museum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 295, § 43, effective July 15, 1980; 2004, ch. 29, § 1, effective December 1, 2005; 2014, ch. 85, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2015 ch. 69, § 8, effective June 24, 2015; 2019 ch. 92, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.